Vermont, session 2025-2026, S58.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 269 is added to read:
§ 269. STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND FIREFIGHTERS;
PAY PLAN; REQUIREMENTS
(a) Law enforcement officers employed by the Department of Fish and
Wildlife, the Department of Liquor and Lottery, and the Department of Motor
VT LEG #380033 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.58
2025 Page 2 of 3
Vehicles and firefighters employed by the State shall be paid according to a
step pay plan that permits law enforcement officers and firefighters to reach
the highest step for the applicable pay grade upon achieving 18 years and six
months of service.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the State and any
collective bargaining representative of law enforcement officers employed by
the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of Liquor and Lottery,
and the Department of Motor Vehicles or of firefighters employed by the State
from determining through collective bargaining the number of steps in a pay
plan subject to this section, the time in each step in such a plan, or any
conditions required for a law enforcement officer or firefighter to advance to
the next step in such a plan.
Sec. 2. TRANSITIONAL PROVISIONS
(a)(1) Law enforcement officers employed by the Department of Fish and
Wildlife, the Department of Liquor and Lottery, and the Department of Motor
Vehicles and firefighters employed by the State whose pay plan on January 1,
2025 does not meet the requirements of 3 V.S.A. § 269 shall be transitioned to
a new pay plan that meets the requirements of 3 V.S.A. § 269 on or before July
1, 2025.
(2) Each law enforcement officer and firefighter employed by the State
on January 1, 2025 who transitions to a new pay plan pursuant to this
VT LEG #380033 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.58
2025 Page 3 of 3
subsection on July 1, 2025 shall be placed one step higher on the new pay plan
than the law enforcement officer or firefighter would have been had the pay
plan in effect on January 1, 2025 remained in effect.
(b) The State shall engage in impact negotiations with the Vermont State
Employees Association to implement the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section and 3 V.S.A. § 269.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage and shall apply to all collective
bargaining agreements for State employees that take effect on or after July 1,
2025.
VT LEG #380033 v.1